it: Caratteristiche di sicurezza del tagliafilo a ciondolo: Coprilama/fessura protetta; Compatibile con cordino di sicurezza; Meccanismo di sicurezza per bambini; Copertura con blocco; Sblocco di sicurezza con chiusura magnetica; Non specificato; Lama retrattile; Altro
en: Pendant cutter safety features: Blade shield/guarded slot; Breakaway lanyard compatible; Child-resistant mechanism; Locking cover; Magnetic clasp safety release; Not specified; Retractable blade; Other
pt-BR: Cortador pingente recursos de segurança: Protetor de lâmina/fenda protegida; Compatível com cordão com trava de segurança; Mecanismo resistente a crianças; Tampa com trava; Abertura de segurança por fecho magnético; Não especificado; Lâmina retrátil; Outros
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ασφαλείας κοπτικού κρεμαστού κοσμήματος: Ασπίδα λεπίδας/προστατευμένη υποδοχή; Συμβατό με κορδόνι ασφαλείας; Μηχανισμός ασφαλείας για παιδιά; Κάλυμμα με κλείδωμα; Μαγνητικό κούμπωμα απασφάλισης; Δεν καθορίζεται; Αναδιπλούμενη λεπίδα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 吊墜式切割器安全特色: 刀片護罩/保護槽; 相容於防勒掛繩; 防兒童開啟機制; 鎖定蓋; 磁扣安全釋放; 未指定; 伸縮刀片; 其他
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjoner for anhengsskjærer: Bladskjold / beskyttet spor; Kompatibel med utløsersnor; Barnesikret mekanisme; Låsedeksel; Sikkerhetsutløser med magnetisk lås; Ikke spesifisert; Inntrekkbart blad; Annet
pl: Funkcje bezpieczeństwa nożyka-wisiorka: Osłona ostrza / chroniona szczelina; Zgodność ze smyczą zrywalną (breakaway); Mechanizm zabezpieczający przed dziećmi; Zamykana osłona; Bezpieczne zapięcie magnetyczne; Nie określono; Ostrze chowane; Inne
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné prvky závesnej rezačky: Kryt čepele/chránená drážka; Kompatibilné s bezpečnostnou šnúrkou; Mechanizmus s detskou poistkou; Uzamykateľný kryt; Bezpečnostné uvoľnenie magnetickej spony; Nešpecifikované; Zaťahovacia čepeľ; Iné
th: คุณสมบัติความปลอดภัยของเครื่องตัดจี้: แผ่นปิดใบมีด/ช่องป้องกัน; รองรับสายคล้องคอแบบนิรภัย; กลไกป้องกันเด็ก; ฝาครอบแบบล็อก; ตัวล็อกแม่เหล็กนิรภัย; ไม่ได้ระบุ; ใบมีดแบบดึงกลับได้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 吊式切割器安全特性: 刀片护罩/防护槽; 兼容断开式安全挂绳; 儿童安全机制; 锁定盖; 磁扣安全释放装置; 未指定; 可伸缩刀片; 其他
hr-HR: Sigurnosne značajke rezača privjesaka: Štitnik oštrice / zaštićeni utor; Kompatibilno sa sigurnosnom vrpcom (Breakaway lanyard); Mehanizam otporan na djecu; Poklopac s bravicom; Sigurnosno otpuštanje magnetne kopče; Nije navedeno; Uvlačiva oštrica; Ostalo
lt-LT: Pakabuko pjaustytuvo saugos funkcijos: Ašmenų apsauga / apsaugotas lizdas; Suderinamas su atsegamu dirželiu; Vaikams nepasiekiamas mechanizmas; Fiksuojamas dangtelis; Apsauginis magnetinis užsegimas; Nenurodyta; Įtraukiami ašmenys; Kita
ru: Функции безопасности подвесного резака: Защитный экран / закрытый паз; Совместимость с разрывным шнурком; Механизм защиты от детей; Запирающаяся крышка; Магнитная застежка с безопасным расцеплением; Не указано; Выдвижное лезвие; Другое
sl-SI: Varnostne lastnosti rezalnika v obliki obeska: Ščitnik rezila/zaščitena reža; Združljivo z varnostno vrvico; Varnostni mehanizem za otroke; Zaklepni pokrov; Magnetna zaponka z varnostnim odpenjanjem; Ni določeno; Zložljivo rezilo; Drugo
pt-PT: características de segurança do cortador de pingentes: Proteção de lâmina/ranhura protegida; Compatível com fita de pescoço destacável; Mecanismo resistente à abertura por crianças; Cobertura de bloqueio; Desengate de segurança de fecho magnético; Não especificado; Lâmina retrátil; Outro
fr: Dispositifs de sécurité du coupe-fil pendentif: Protège-lame/fente sécurisée; Compatible avec cordon détachable; Mécanisme à l’épreuve des enfants; Couvercle de verrouillage; Ouverture de sécurité à fermoir magnétique; Non spécifié; Lame rétractable; Autre
fi: Turvavyöleikkurin turvaominaisuudet: Terän suojus / suojattu ura; Yhteensopiva turvalukollisen kaulanauhan kanssa; Lapsilukollinen mekanismi; Lukittava suojakansi; Magneettilukon turvavapautus; Ei määritetty; Sisäänvedettävä terä; Muu
ko: 펜던트 커터 안전 기능: 블레이드 실드/보호 슬롯; 분리형 랜야드 호환; 어린이 보호 장치; 잠금 커버; 자석 걸쇠 안전 해제 장치; 지정되지 않음; 수납식 칼날; 기타
sv: Säkerhetsfunktioner för hängsmyckesskärare: Bladskydd/skyddad skåra; Kompatibel med säkerhetslina; Barnsäkerhetsmekanism; Låsande lock; Säkerhetsöppning med magnetlås; Ej angivet; Infällbart blad; Övrigt
vi: Các tính năng an toàn của máy cắt mặt dây chuyền: Màn chắn lưỡi/khe cắm có màng bảo vệ; Tương thích với dây đeo tháo rời; Cơ chế chống trẻ em; Nắp khóa; Khóa nam châm an toàn; Không xác định; Lưỡi dao có thể thu gọn; Khác
ja: ペンダントカッターの安全機能: ブレードシールド/保護スロット; ブレイクアウェイランヤード対応; チャイルドレジスタント機構; ロック付きカバー; マグネットクラスプ安全解除; 未指定; 収納式ブレード; その他
de: Sicherheitsmerkmale des Anhängerschneiders: Klingenschutz/geschützter Schlitz; Mit Sicherheits-Lanyard kompatibel; Kindersicherer Mechanismus; Verschließbare Abdeckung; Sicherheitsauslöser mit Magnetverschluss; Nicht angegeben; Einziehbare Klinge; Sonstige
ro-RO: Caracteristici de siguranță ale tăietorului de pandantive: Scut lamă/fantă cu protecție; Compatibil cu șnur cu eliberare rapidă; Mecanism cu protecție pentru copii; Capac de blocare; Eliberare de siguranță cu închizătoare magnetică; Nespecificat; Lamă retractabilă; Altele
tr: Kolye tipi kesici güvenlik özellikleri: Bıçak kalkanı/korumalı yuva; Kopan boyun askısı ile uyumlu; Çocuk kilitli mekanizma; Kilitli kapak; Manyetik toka güvenlik kilidi; Belirtilmemiş; Geri çekilebilir bıçak; Diğer
hu: Medálos cérnavágó biztonsági funkciói: Pengevédő / védett nyílás; Biztonsági zsinórral kompatibilis; Gyermekzáras mechanizmus; Zárható fedél; Mágneses biztonsági csat; Nincs megadva; Visszahúzható penge; Egyéb
cs: Bezpečnostní prvky řezačky přívěsků: Kryt čepele / chráněný otvor; Kompatibilní s bezpečnostní šňůrkou; Mechanismus s dětskou pojistkou; Uzamykatelný kryt; Bezpečnostní magnetické zapínání; Nespecifikováno; Zasouvací čepel; Ostatní
bg-BG: Функции за безопасност на резачка за висулки: Предпазител на острието/защитен прорез; Съвместим с откопчаваща се връзка; Механизъм, устойчив на деца; Заключващ се капак; Безопасно освобождаване с магнитна закопчалка; Не е посочено; Прибиращо се острие; Други
nl: Hanger snijder veiligheidskenmerken: Mesbeschermer/afgeschermde gleuf; Compatibel met veiligheidskoord; Kindveilig mechanisme; Vergrendelbare kap; Magnetische veiligheidssluiting; Niet gespecificeerd; Intrekbaar mesje; Overig
da: Sikkerhedsfunktioner for vedhængssaks: Klingebeskytter/skærmet åbning; Kompatibel med sikkerhedssnor; Børnesikret mekanisme; Låsbart dæksel; Sikkerhedsudløser med magnetlås; Ikke angivet; Indtrækkelig klinge; Andet
es: Características de seguridad del cortador colgante: Protector de hoja/ranura protegida; Compatible con cordón de seguridad; Mecanismo a prueba de niños; Tapa con seguro; Cierre magnético de seguridad; No especificado; Hoja retráctil; Otro